Nebraska, session 109, LB581.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB581 LB581
2025 2025
1 Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $3,000,000 from the General
2 Fund for FY2025-26 to the Department of Health and Human Services for
3 behavioral health services for youth in a facility that has an early
4 childhood development center.
-2-